src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!  --------------------
!! The Hiligaynon language adjectives compare.

LEXICON Adjectives
@U.ADJ.PRE@:@U.ADJ.PRE@ma Adj_Root ;
@U.ADJ.CIR@:@U.ADJ.CIR@ma Adj_Root ;
Adj_Root ;
Adj_Uninflected ;
Adv_Root ;

LEXICON Adj
Adj_Suffix ;
@U.ADJ.PRE@+A:@U.ADJ.PRE@ # ;

LEXICON Adj_Suffix
+A:%>on # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
