src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjectives
!  ----------
!! Adjectives in the Hiligaynon language describe things.

LEXICON Adj_Root
ayo Adj "good" ;
lipay Adj "happy" ;
subo Adj "sad" ;
akig Adj "angry" ;
dasig Adj "fast" ;
hinay Adj "slow" ;
dako Adj "big" ;
gamay Adj "small" ;
damo Adj "many" ;
diutay Adj "few" ;
tuod Adj "true" ;

LEXICON Adj_Uninflected
tanan Adj_Tag "all" ;
iban Adj_Tag "other" ;
pareho Adj_Tag "same, similar" ;
parehas Adj_Tag "same, similar" ;

LEXICON Adv_Root !!TODO Alphabetize
man Adv_Tag "also" ;
gid Adv_Tag "very" ;
pa Adv_Tag "more, yet" ;
na Adv_Tag "already" ;
lang Adv_Tag "only" ;
lamang Adv_Tag "only" ;
daw Adv_Tag "like" ;
bisan Adv_Tag "even" ;
karon Adv_Tag "now, later" ;
dayon Adv_Tag "immediately" ;
naman Adv_Tag "again" ;
subong Adv_Tag "now, current" ;
samtang Adv_Tag "while" ;
liwat Adv_Tag "again" ;
anay Adv_Tag "first" ;

LEXICON Adj_Tag
+A:0 # ;

LEXICON Adv_Tag
+Adv:0 # ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
